Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1742
Bonds issued to acquire federally guaranteed securities; provisions applicable.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the Nebraska Educational Finance Authority Act to the contrary, the authority may finance the cost of a project or program, refund outstanding indebtedness, or reimburse advances from any endowment or any similar fund of a private institution of higher education as authorized by the act, by issuing its bonds pursuant to a plan of financing involving the acquisition of any federally guaranteed security or securities or the acquisition or entering into of commitments to acquire any federally guaranteed security or securities. For purposes of this section, federally guaranteed security shall mean any direct obligation of or obligation the principal of and interest on which are fully guaranteed or insured by the United States of America or any obligation issued by or the principal of and interest on which are fully guaranteed or insured by any agency or instrumentality of the United States of America, including without limitation any such obligation that is issued pursuant to the National Housing Act, or any successor provision of law, each as amended from time to time.

In furtherance of the powers granted in this section, the authority may acquire or enter into commitments to acquire any federally guaranteed security and pledge or otherwise use any such federally guaranteed security in such manner as the authority deems in its best interest to secure or otherwise provide a source of repayment of any of its bonds issued to finance or refinance a project or program or may enter into any appropriate agreement with any private institution of higher education whereby the authority may make a loan to any such private institution of higher education for the purpose of acquiring or entering into commitments to acquire any federally guaranteed security.

Any agreement entered into pursuant to this section may contain such provisions as are deemed necessary or desirable by the authority for the security or protection of the authority or the holders of such bonds, except that the authority, prior to making any such acquisition, commitment, or loan, shall first determine and enter into an agreement with any such private institution of higher education or any other appropriate institution or corporation to require that the proceeds derived from the acquisition of any such federally guaranteed security will be used, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of financing or refinancing a project or program.

Any bonds issued pursuant to this section shall not exceed in principal amount the cost of financing or refinancing such project or program as determined by the participating private institution of higher education and approved by the authority, except that such costs may include, without limitation, all costs and expenses necessary or incidental to the acquisition of or commitment to acquire any federally guaranteed security and to the issuance and obtaining of any insurance or guarantee of any obligation issued or incurred in connection with any federally guaranteed security. In other respects any such bonds shall be subject to the act, including sections 85-1738 and 85-1739, and the trust agreement creating such bonds may contain such of the provisions set forth in section 85-1740 as the authority may deem appropriate.

If a project is financed or refinanced pursuant to this section, the title to such project shall remain in the participating private institution of higher education owning the same, subject to the lien of any mortgage or security interest securing, directly or indirectly, the federally guaranteed securities then being purchased or to be purchased, and there shall be no lease of such facility between the authority and such institution.

Section 85-1737 shall not apply to any project financed pursuant to this section, but the authority shall return the securities purchased through the issuance of bonds pursuant to this section to the issuer of such securities when such securities have been fully paid, when such bonds have been fully paid and retired, or when adequate provision, not involving the application of such securities, has been made to pay and retire such bonds fully, all other conditions of the resolution, trust agreement, or indenture creating such bonds have been satisfied, and the lien on such bonds has been released in accordance with the act.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 42;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 22;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2942;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 42.